Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Board of Directors [Repealed]

7-83-401. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.55 (Williams, § 3708.58); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2716; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 4, §§7-83-401 —7-83-404, concerned the board of directors of power districts.

7-83-402. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.55 (Williams, § 3708.58); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2717; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 4, §§7-83-401 —7-83-404, concerned the board of directors of power districts.

7-83-403. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.55 (Williams, § 3708.58); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2718; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 4, §§7-83-401 —7-83-404, concerned the board of directors of power districts.

7-83-404. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.56 (Williams, § 3708.59); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2719; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 4, §§7-83-401 —7-83-404, concerned the board of directors of power districts.